lithuanian.sbl
ls ( stem )
//Stemmer for test1.txt data
/* Special characters in Unicode Latin-1 and Latin Extended-A */
// ' nosine 
stringdef a'   decimal '261'  // ą a + ogonek
stringdef e'   decimal '281'  // ę e + ogonek
stringdef i'   decimal '303'  // į i + ogonek
stringdef u'   decimal '371'  // ų u + ogonek

// . taskas
stringdef e.   decimal '279'  // ė e + dot

// - ilgoji
stringdef u-   decimal '363'  // ū u + macron 

// * varnele
stringdef c*   decimal '269'  // č c + caron (haček)
stringdef s*   decimal '353'  // š s + caron (haček)
stringdef z*   decimal '382'  // ž z + caron (haček)

// [C](VC)^m[V|C]
// definitions of variables for
// p1 - position of m = 0
// p2 - position of m = 1
integers ( p1 p2 )

// booleans - to be commented
// PRE
// FOUND
// CHANGE  
booleans ( PRE FOUND CHANGE )

// escape symbols for substituting lithuanian characters
stringescapes { }

// groupings
// v - lithuanian vowels
groupings ( v )

// v - all lithuanian vowels
define v 'aeiyou{a'}{e'}{i'}{u'}{e.}{u-}'

// all lithuanian stemmer routines: 5 steps 
routines (
   step2 R1 R2 step1 fix_chdz fix_gd
)



backwardmode(
  define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
  define step1 as repeat (
	 setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) R1  among(
      'a' 'ai' 'ain' 'aut' 'ais' 'al' 'ams' 'as' 'atv' 'au' 'auj' 'aus' 'avim'
      'e' 'ei' 'eiv' 'um' 'ekl' 'el' 'enie' 'enims' 'enis' 'eniu' 'ens' 'enyb' 'ers' 'es' 
      'i' 'ia' 'iai' 'iais' 'iams' 'ias' 'iau' 'iaus' 'id' 'ie' 'ien' 'ienoj' 'ies' 'iet' 'ij' 'ik' 'ikl' 
      'il'  'im' 'imas' 'imi' 'imis' 'ims'  'io' 'ioje' 'iomis' 'ioms' 'ios' 'iose' 'is' 'iu' 
      'iui' 'iuje' 'iuk' 'iumi' 'iuose' 'ius' 'i{a'}' 'i{s*}k' 'i{u'}' 'j{u'}' 'i{u-}k{s*}' 'in{e'}' 'in{e.}' 'ij{a'}' 'iuo' 'iaud'
      'ij{u'}'
      'jim'
      'kl'
      's'
      'm' 
      'o' 'oj' 'oje' 'ojant' 'iniai' 'ojim' 'ok' 'ok{s*}n' 'iant' 'omis' 'odam' 'ni{a'}j' 'oms' 'os' 'ose' 'ov' 'o{c*}'
      'sen' 'sm' 'sn'
       '{z*}ti'  'ti' 'tin' 'toj' 'ing' 'tu' 'tuk' 'tuv' 'tyn'  'tyv' 'tydam'
      'u' 'ui' 'uje' 'uk' 'ul' 'uly'  'umi' 'umis'  'uol' 'uomen' 'uose' 'us' 'ut' 'u{z*}'
      'y' 'yb' 'yje' 'amet' 'yk' 'ykl' 'ym' 'yn' 'ys' 'yse' 'yst' 'yt'
      '{a'}'
      '{e'}'
      '{e.}' '{e.}j' '{e.}je' '{e.}mis' '{e.}ms' '{e.}n' '{e.}s' '{e.}se' '{e.}z' '{e.}l'
      '{i'}'
      '{s*}{e.}'
      '{u'}'
      '{u-}n'
      '{u-}s'
      'an'
    )

    delete
  )

  define step2 as repeat (
     setlimit tomark p1 for ([substring]) among(
       'tydam' 'os' 'uoda' 'uodam'  'audam' 
      'tuodav' 'tuoj' 'uodav'
      'nam{e.}s' 'nasi' 'nat{e.}s' 'niesi' 'nuosi' '{z*}dam'
      'indav' 'audav' 'indam' 'ind' 'odav' 'voj' 'iuot'
      'uot' 'sies' 'sim{e.}s' 'sit{e.}s' 'siuos' 'uojat' 'uod' 'iej' 'int'
       'd{e.}k'
      '{e.}dam' '{e.}dav' 'gdav' 'gd' 'iuodam' 'aut' 'ią' 'iav' 'um' 'dav' 'davaisi' 'davausi' 'davom{e.}s' 'davosi' 'davotės' 'kis'
     'auj' 'aisi' 'ausi' 'esn' 'es'
     'tumei' 'tum{e.}m{e.}s' 'tum{e.}m{e.}' 'tum{e.}s' 'tum{e.}' 'tut{e.}s' 'tut{e.}' 't{u'}si'
      'ot'  
     '{e.}tum' '{e.}m' '{e.}t' '{e.}s' '{e.}si' 'in' 'inink'
     'ytum' 'ydav' 'ytume' 'ytum{e.}me' 'ytum{e.}te' 'ytute' 'yt{u-}' 'y{c*}iau'
     'uriuo'
     'si' 'sis' 'tis' 'sime' 'site' 'odam'
     '{z*}iau'
     '{c*}iau'
     'av'
     '{a'}j'
     
     
   
    
    )
    delete
  )

  define fix_chdz as ( 
    [substring] among (
      '{c*}' (<-'t' set CHANGE)
      'd{z*}' (<-'d' set CHANGE)
    )
  )

 define fix_gd as ( 
    [substring] among (
      'gd' (<-'g' set CHANGE)
     
    )
  )

)

define stem as (

  $p1 = limit
  $p2 = limit
    
  do(
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p1
    gopast v  gopast non-v  setmark p2
	
  )
   
  backwards (
    do step1
    do fix_chdz
    do step2
    fix_gd
  )

)
